test/src/morphology/sje-adjectives_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - gävvra: # -a-stammar
    gävvra+A+Sg+Nom: gävvra
    gävvra+A+Attr: gievvres
    gävvra+A+Sg+Gen: gävra
    gävvra+A+Sg+Acc: gävrav
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ill: gävvraj
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ine: gävran
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ela: gävrast
    gävvra+A+Sg+Com: gävrajn
    gävvra+A+Pl+Nom: gävra
    gävvra+A+Pl+Gen: gävraj
    gävvra+A+Pl+Acc: gävrajt
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ill: gävrajda
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ine: gävrajn
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ela: gävrajst
    gävvra+A+Pl+Com: gävraj
    gävvra+A+Ess: gävvran
    gävvra+A+Abe: gävradak

  Adjektiv - nuorra: # -a-stammar
    nuorra+A+Sg+Nom: nuorra
    nuorra+A+Attr: nuorra
    nuorra+A+Sg+Gen: nuora
    nuorra+A+Sg+Acc: nuorav
    nuorra+A+Sg+Ill: nuorraj
    nuorra+A+Sg+Ine: nuoran
    nuorra+A+Sg+Ela: nuorast
    nuorra+A+Sg+Com: nuorajn
    nuorra+A+Pl+Nom: nuora
    nuorra+A+Pl+Gen: nuoraj
    nuorra+A+Pl+Acc: nuorajt
    nuorra+A+Pl+Ill: nuorajda
    nuorra+A+Pl+Ine: nuorajn
    nuorra+A+Pl+Ela: nuorajst
    nuorra+A+Pl+Com: nuoraj
    nuorra+A+Ess: nuorran
    nuorra+A+Abe: nuoradak
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nuorap
    nuorra+A+Comp+Attr: nuorap
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: nuorabu
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: nuorabuv
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: nuorrabuj
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: nuorabun
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: nuorabust
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Sg+Com: nuorabujn
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: nuorabu
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: nuorabuj
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: nuorabujt
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: nuorabujda
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: nuorabujn
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: nuorabujst
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Pl+Com: nuorabuj
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Ess: nuorrabun
    nuorrabu+A+Comp+Abe: nuorabudak
